internal_storage/hyphen_dictionaries/hyph_la_classical_ec.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
.a1b1
.ab3a2u
.2aba
.ab3á1u
.2abá
.ab3á1v
.abe4
.ab3er
.ab3e2s
.2abé2
.ab3é2s
.abi2
.ab3i4n
.ab3is
.ab1i4u
.ab1i4v
.abí2
.abí4n
.2abo2
.2abó2
.ab3u
.ad3á
.a1d1
.ade4
.ad3er
.ad3e2s
.adé2
.ad3é1r
.ad3é2s
.ad3i1b2
.ad3i4c
.ad3ie
.ad3ié
.adi4m
.ad3i4n
.ad3i4q
.ad3is
.ad3i4t
.adi4u
.ad3i4v
.adí4c
.adí4m
.ad3í4n
.ad3í4q
.ad3ís
.adí4t
.ad3í4u2
.ad3í4v
.ad6ora.
.ado2
.ado1ra
.ad6or4a3ne
.ad6ora1q
.ad6oraue.
.ador4au2e1
.adora1u
.ad6orave.
.ador2a1v
.adorave1
.ad6ó6ra.
.adó1ra
.adó4ro1
.ad3us
.adú2
.ae2a
.ae1
.ae4s1t
.a2g2n2
.a1g
.aí2
.a1í3b
.am4bi.
.1a2m1b
.am4b5i4n
.am4b5i4q
.am6b5is.
.am6b5i2s1n
.am6b5i2s3q
.am6b5is1u
.am6b5i2s1v
.ambi6u2e
.am2b1i2u
.amb6iui.
.ambi1ui
.amb6iu2i1n
.amb6iui1q
.amb6iuiu2
.amb6iuí1n
.ambi1uí
.amb6iuí1q
.amb6iuí1u2
.am2bi6ve1
.amb1i2v
.am6b6ivi.
.ambiv2i
.am4b6ivi1n
.am4b6ivi1q
.am4b6i1vi1v
.amb6iví1n
.am2biví
.amb6iví1q
.amb6i1ví1v
.am4bí4n
.amb1í
.am4bí4q
.am4bís
.am6bí6u2e
.ambí1u2
.am6bí6ve1
.ambí1v
.am4bú
.an6t5ea.
.a2n1t
.an3t2e
.ante1a
.ant2e5i4
.ant2e5í4
.as2c
.as4t2a
.2as1t
.as4tá
.as4t2e
.as4té
.as4t2o
.as4tó
.as6tra1r
.ast2r2
.as6tra1t
.as6trá1r
.ast1rá
.as6trá2s3
.as4tru
.2at2e2
.a1t
.á1b1
.ába2
.áb3a1u
.áb3a1v
.ábe4
.ábi2
.á1d1
.áde4
.ád3e1s
.ád3ie
.ád3is
.ád3i4t
.áes3
.áes5t
.ám4bi.
.1á2m1b
.ám4b5is
.án4ter
.2án
.á2n1t
.án3t2e
.ás4t2a
.2ás1t
.ás4t2e
.ás4t2o
.ás4tru
.ást2r2
.æs3t2
.æ1
.b1a3g
.1b
.ba4ia.
.ba1i
.bai2a
.ba4iae1
.ba4iam
.ba6ia3ne.
.bai4an
.bai2a3ne
.ba4ia1q
.ba4ia1r
.ba4i2as
.ba4ia1u
.ba4i2a1v
.ba4iáe
.bai2á
.ba4iám
.ba6iá3ne.
.bai4á1ne
.bai2án
.ba4i2á1q
.ba4iá1r
.ba4iás
.ba4iá1u
.ba4i2á1v
.ba4i2i
.ba4ií
.bi3
.c2a3ru
.1c
.c2a
.ca1r
.c2atá3
.ca1t
.cá2i
.ce2n3s
.c2e
.c2en
.ci6s5té
.c2i
.cis3t
.co3i4
.c2o
.co1í4
.1co4n5i4c
.con1
.c2o1ni
.1co4ní4c
.c2o1ní
.có4mi4t
.có1m2i
.1có4n5i4c
.có1n
.có1ni
.1de3d2
.1d
.de4m2e1t
.de1m
.de1me
.de1s2
.deu4t2a
.de1u
.d2eu1t
.deu4tá
.dé3s2
.di3g
.di4r5e4m
.di1re
.di4r5é4m
.di1ré
.dis6cendam
.d2is1c
.disc2e
.disc2en
.1disce2n3d2
.dis6cend2as
.dis6cendám
.discend2á
.dis6cendás
.dis6cendi
.dis6cendí
.dis6cendo.
.discen3do
.dis6cend2on
.dis6cend2o1q
.dis6cend2o3u2
.dis6cend2o3v
.dis6cend2ó1n
.dis6cend2ó1q
.dis6cend2ó1u2
.dis6cend2ó1v
.dis6céndam
.disc2é
.disc2én
.1discé2n1d2
.dis6cénd2as
.dis6cénd2e
.dis6céndi
.dis6céndo.
.discén3do
.dis6ta1u
.di3st2a
.dis1t
.dis6t2a1v
.do3l
.d1ó3l2
.e1d2
.ed4i
.ed4o
.2e1i2
.e1r2e
.e2r1e5x4
.et3i
.2e1t
.2eu3t
.e1u
.ex3é1q
.e1x1
.ex2é
.ex3i4
.ex3í4
.ex3u4
.exú4
.2é1t1
.ét3e2
.ét3i
.é1x1
.éxi2
.h2e1
.1h
.he1m2i3
.he1m
.hi6s5t2e
.h2i
.his3t
.hi6st2r2
.i3d3eo
.2i1d
.i3d2e
.i3d3í
.id3u2e
.id2u
.ie3s1u
.ie2s
.ié3s1u
.ié2s
.ig4n2a1r
.i2g1n2
.i1g
.ig1na
.ig4n2á1r
.ig1ná
.ig4nó
.i1n1
.i1n3a4
.i1n3á4
.2i3n3e4
.i3n3é2
.i1n3i4
.i1ní4
.2i3n3o4
.2i3nó4
.i2n3t
.inte6re6ri
.3in3t2e
.inte1re
.inte6r2e6rí
.inte6res
.inte6rés
.int2e1ré
.int2e6ri.
.inte1ri4
.inte6ri3m2us
.interi1m
.inte6ri3m2ús
.interi1mú
.i1nt2e6ri1n
.int2e6ri1q
.inte6ris
.inte6rit.
.in1teri1t
.int2e6rit2e
.inte6rit2i
.inte6rití
.inte6ri2t1n
.inte6rito.
.interit2o
.inte6riton
.inte6rit2o1q
.in1te6ri1to1t
.inte6rit2o1u2
.inte6rit2o1v
.inte6ritó1n
.inte6rit2ó1q
.in1te6ri1tó1t
.inte6rit2ó1u2
.inte6rit2ó1v
.inte6ri2t1q
.inte6ritú
.inte6ri2t1v
.int2e6rí
.interí6n
.interí6q
.in1terí6t
.inté6re6ri
.3inté
.inté1r
.int2é1re
.inté6ri6t2e
.in1téri1t
.inté6ri6t2i
.inté6ri6to.
.intérit2o
.in3u4d2
.1i1n1u2
.in3u2e
.in3ui
.in3uí
.2i3n3u2s
.inú4d
.2i1nú
.2io3s4
.io1
.2ió3s2
.is5t2a
.is1t
.is5t2e
.is5t2i
.is5tí
.is3t2r2
.í3d3eo
.2í1d
.í3d2e
.í1n1
.í1ne4
.í1ni2
.í2n3t
.ín3ui
.í1nu
.jo3s4
.1j
.jo1
.jó3s2
.li4g5n2
.1l
.l2i
.li1g
.l2i3no3
.li1n
.l2i3nó3
.lí2g3n2
.lí1g
.lí3t
.ma3g2e
.m1a1g
.magnæ6u2
.ma2g3n2
.mag1næ1
.magnæ6v
.1ne1
.ne3q
.ne5s4c
.n2eu4t
.ne1u
.ne3x1o2
.n1e1x1
.1né1
.nés2
.né5ut2e3
.n2é1u
.né2u1t
.n1o1b2
.1no
.no6s5t2e
.n2os
.n2os3t
.oba2
.1o1b1
.ob3e4r
.ob3e2s
.ob3é2
.obi2
.ob3i4n
.ob3is
.o2b1i4u
.o3b1i4v
.obí4
.obo2
.oc4té
.o1c
.o2c1t
.ordí3
.o2r1d2
.2os3t
.ó1b1
.pa4r5ui
.1p
.p2a
.p2ar2u
.pa1r
.pa4r5uí
.pá4r1ui
.p2á
.pá1r
.p2áru
.pe2r
.p2e
.pe1r3a
.pera4r
.peras5
.peræ4q
.per1æ2
.pe1re4
.p2er5e2á
.per5e1m
.p2er5e2o
.p2er5e2ó
.per5e4s
.p2e1ré4
.per5ém
.per5é4s
.pe6rie2ns
.pe1ri
.p2erie
.pe3ri2en
.per6i2e3re.
.per3ie1r
.perie3r2e
.per6ie3re1ne
.peri2er2en
.per6i2ere1q
.per6i2ere1u
.per6i2er2e1v
.per6ieris
.pe1rie3ri
.per6ierís
.peri2e1rí
.per5iéri1m
.p2erié
.perié1r
.per5iéri1t
.per5i2éru
.pe4r5ii
.per5ií
.pe5rill2e
.pe2r1i1l
.peri2l1l
.pe5r6ill2i
.pe5rillí
.pe5ri3mi1n
.per5i1m2i
.peri1m
.per6imi1n2i
.per6imi1ní
.pe5ri3mu1r
.per5i6m2us
.pe5ri3múr
.peri1mú
.per5i6m2ús
.per5i3ne
.p2eri4n
.p2er5i4q
.peri6re.
.peri3r4e
.per5i6r2em.
.perire1m
.pe5rir6e1m2i
.per5i6r2e2m1n2
.per5i6r2e2m1q
.per5i6re2m1u2e
.perir2emu
.pe5rire3mu1r
.per5i6re1m2us
.pe5riremúr
.perir2e1mú
.per5i6rem2ús
.per5i6r2e2m1v
.peri6re1ne
.perir2en
.per5i6rent.
.perire2n1t
.per5i6ren2t1n
.per5i6ren2t1q
.per5i6ren2t1u2e
.pe5rirentu1r
.pe5rirentú
.per5i6ren2t1v
.peri6re1q
.pe5rirer
.per5i6res
.peri6r2e1t
.per5iret.
.per5iret2i
.per5iretí
.per5ire2t1n
.per5ire2t1q
.per5ire2t1u2e
.per5ire2t1v
.peri6re1u
.peri6r2e1v
.pe5riré1m2i
.peri1ré
.per5i6r2é2m1n2
.per5i6r2é2m1q
.per5i6ré2m1u2e
.perir2ému
.pe5riré1mu1r
.per5i6ré1m2us
.per5i6r2é2m1v
.per5i6rén2t1n
.perir2én
.periré2n1t
.per5i6rén2t1q
.per5i6rén2t1u2e
.pe5riréntu1r
.per5i6rén2t1v
.pe5riré1r
.per5i6rés
.peri6r2é1t
.per5irét2i
.per5iré2t1n
.per5iré2t1q
.per5iré2t1u2e
.per5iré2t1v
.pe5ri1r2i
.pe5ri1rí
.per5isse.
.peri2s1s2
.peris3se
.per5iss2e1m
.per5iss2en
.per5iss2e3q
.per5isses
.per5iss2e1t
.pe6r5iss2e3u2e
.pe5risse1u
.per5iss2e1v
.per5issém
.peris3s2é
.per5iss2én
.per5issés
.per5iss2é1t
.per5is5t2i
.peris1t
.per5istí
.per5it.
.peri1t
.peri6t2a
.peri6tá
.peri6t2æ1
.peri6t2e
.peri6ti.
.perit2i
.peri6ti1n
.peri6ti3q
.peri6tis.
.periti2s
.peri6t2i2s1n
.peri6t2i2s3q
.peri6t2is1u
.peri6ti2s1v
.peri6ti1u2e
.peri6ti1v
.peri6tí1n
.peri6tí3q
.peri6tí2s1n
.perití2s
.peri6tís3q
.peri6tís3u
.peri6tí2s1v
.peri6tí1u2
.peri6tí1v
.per5i2t1n
.peri6to.
.perit2o
.peri6ton
.peri6t2o1q
.pe5rit2or.
.pe5rito2r1n2
.pe5rit2o2r1q
.pe5rito2r1u2e
.perit2o1ru
.peri6to3rum
.peri6t2o3rú
.pe5rit2o2r1v
.peri6tos
.per5i6to1t
.peri6t2o1u2
.peri6t2o1v
.peri6tó1n
.peri6t2ó1q
.pe5ritó2r1n2
.pe5rit2ó2r1q
.pe5ritó2r1u2e
.perit2ó1ru
.peri6tó3rum
.pe5rit2ó2r1v
.peri6tós
.per5i6tó1t
.peri6t2ó1u2
.peri6t2ó1v
.per5i2t1q
.peri6tu
.per5i6t1u2e
.peri6tú
.per5i2t1v
.p2e2r5i4u
.p2er5i4v
.per5í2e1
.p2e1rí
.pe5r2í1l
.pe5rí3mi1n
.perí1m2i
.pe5rí1mu1r
.per5í6m2us
.perí4n
.per5í1ne
.per5í4q
.perí6re.
.perí1r
.perí1re
.per5í6re1m
.perí6r2en
.per5íre2n1t
.perí6re1q
.pe5rírer
.per5í6res
.per5í6r2e1t
.perí6re1u
.perí6r2e1v
.pe5ríri
.per5í2s1s2
.per5íst2i
.perís3t
.perí6tan
.perí1t
.perít2a
.perí6ta3q
.perí6ta1u
.perí6t2a1v
.perí6t2e
.perí6ti2s
.perít2i
.per5í2t1n
.perí6to.
.perít2o
.pe5rítor
.per5í2t1q
.per5í2t1u2e
.perí2tu
.per5í2t1v
.per5í4u2
.per5í4v
.per5o4s
.pero1
.per5ó4s
.pe1ró
.per5uí
.3p2é3i
.p2é4r3e
.pé1r
.pé4ri.
.p2é4rie
.pé4r5ii
.pé4ris
.pé4r5i4t
.pi6s3t2r2
.p2i
.pis1t
.po6te6ris
.p2o
.pote3ri
.po1t
.pot2e
.po6te6rís
.pot2e1rí
.po6tes.
.po6t2e2s1n
.po6t2es1q
.po6tes1u
.po6te2s1v
.po4tés
.pó4tes
.pó1t
.pót2e
.pul2e3
.p2u
.pu1l
.pulé3
.ra3d4
.ra3i2
.ra3m
.ra5r2a
.ra1r
.ra5r2á
.r2as5t
.r3a6s4t2e
.rá3i
.1rá
.ræ3
.1re1
.re5d2am.
.2re1d
.re2d1a
.re5d2a2m1q
.re5d2a1mu
.re5d2a2m1v
.re5d2as
.red3e4
.re4dé
.re4di.
.re4d5ie
.re4d5ié
.re4d5ií
.re4d5i4m
.re2d5i4n
.re4d5i4q
.re6d2is.
.redis3
.re6d2i2s1n
.re6d2i2s3q
.re4d5i2s1s2
.re4d5is1t
.re6d2is1u
.re6d2i2s1v
.re4d5i4t
.re4di6u
.red5i1u2e
.re4d2i6v
.red5ive1
.re4d5í4m
.re4d5í4n
.re4d5í4q
.re6dí2s1n
.red2ís
.re6dís3q
.re4d5í2s1s2
.re4d5ís1t
.re6dís1u
.re6dí2s1v
.re4d5í4t
.re4d5í4u2
.re4d5í4v
.re3ó
.r1e1x2
.re5xi
.1ré1
.ré4d3i4
.2ré1d
.ré4s6te1m
.4rést2e
.rés1t
.ré4s6tes
.4r3és4t2o
.ris2
.r1o3b2
.ro1
.ro3d4
.ro5d2i
.ro4d3i5u
.ro4d3i5v
.r2o4s3t
.r1u3r
.ru4s
.s2a3mu
.1sa
.s2am
.s2á3mu
.1sá
.s2ám
.se3iæ1
.1se
.s2e1i
.se3i2o1
.se3ió
.se6mis.
.s2e1m
.se1m2i
.se6m2i4s1n
.se6m2i4s3q
.se6mi4su2e
.sem2is1u
.se6mi4s1v
.se6mí2s1n
.se1mí
.se6mís3q
.se6mís1u
.se6mí2s1v
.s2e3p1s2
.3se1p
.s2é3i
.1s2é
.sé4mis
.sé1m2i3
.s2é3p1s2
.sé1p
.sér4ui
.sé1r
.s2éru
.si4l5ui
.1si
.3s2i1l
.si4l5uí
.si6st2r2
.si4s3t
.sí4lui
.1sí
.s2í1l
.síl1u
.supé6r5is
.s1u
.3s2u1p
.su3pé
.supé1r
.te4i2a
.1t
.t2e
.t2e1i
.te4iá
.te4ie
.te4i2i
.te4ií
.te4i2o1
.te4ió
.te4iú
.te3n4u
.t2en
.te5re
.1ter6i1t
.te1ri
.ter5i5tu1r
.teri4tu
.te5ri5u2e
.t2e2r3i4u
.t2e5r3i5v
.te3r4o1
.té3n4u
.t2én
.tran5s6ue.
.t2r2
.tr2a2ns1
.trans1u
.transu2e
.trán5s6ue.
.t1rá
.tr2án
.trá2ns
.tráns1u
.tránsu2e
.tro4ii
.tro1
.tro1i2
.tro4ií
.tro4i5q
.tro4is
.tro6i1u2e
.tro4i1v
.tro4í
.troí5u2
.troí5v
.tró4ii
.t1ró
.tró1i2
.u1b2
.ue1ni4
.u2e
.u2en
.ue4ni.
.ue6nie2ns
.ueni2en
.ue6n5ie1r
.ue6nié2ns
.ueni2én
.ue6n5ié1r
.ue4ni1m
.ue4ni1n
.ue4ni1q
.ue4nir
.ue4nis
.ue4ni1t
.u2e6n2i1u2e
.ue3niu
.ue4ní4
.uen5í2e1
.ue6s5t2e
.ue4s3t
.ué4ni.
.u2é
.3ué1ni
.u2én
.ué6nie2ns
.uéni2en
.ué4nis
.ué4ni1t
.ul3ui
.u1l
.ul3uí
.2u1m2e
.un3e1t
.u1n2e
.uol6u2e3re.
.1u2o
.uo4lu2e
.uol5ue3r4e
.uo1l
.uol6ue3re1ne
.uolu2er2en
.uol6u2ere1q
.uol6u2ere1u
.uol6uit.
.uo4lui
.uol5ui1t
.uol6ui2t1n
.uol6ui2t1q
.uol6ui2t1u2e
.uo6s5t2e
.u2os3t
.uól6ui.
.1uó1l
.uó2l1u
.uól6uit.
.uólui1t
.u1u2
.ú1b2
.ve1ni4
.1v
.ve1
.v2en
.ve4ni.
.ve6nie2ns
.veni2en
.ve6n5ie1r
.ve6nié2ns
.veni2én
.ve6n5ié1r
.ve4ni1m
.ve4ni1n
.ve4ni1q
.ve4nir
.ve4nis
.ve4ni1t
.1ve4ni1v
.ve4ní4
.ven5í2e1
.ve6s5t2e
.ve4s3t
.vé4ni.
.v2én
.vé1ni
.vé6nie2ns
.véni2en
.vé4nis
.vé4ni1t
.vo6s5t2e
.v2os3t
a1á2
2aba
a1b
aba3i
ab2a1q
aba6s5t2e
ab2as3t
aba2u
ab3aui
ab3auí
ab3a2v
2abá
abá3i
ab1æ3
a2b1eú
2abé
ab2i2a
ab2iá
a2b3i2b2
ab3ic2e
ab1i2c
3a2b1ie
ab4ie2s
ab4i2e1t
3a2b1ié
ab4ié2s
ab4i2é1t
a2b3ii
a2b3ií
ab3i2s1s2
ab3is1t
abi4to1t
abi1t
abit2o
abi4tó1t
a2b3í2b
a2bí2e1
ab3íer
a2b1íi
a2b3í2mu
ab3í2s1s2
ab3ís1t
a2b3í2t2o
abí1t
1a2b1j
1a2b1l2
1a2b1n2
2abo
2abó
ab1r2
ab3rá
1a2b1s
ab2s2q
ab4ste1m
abs1t
abst2e
ab4st2i
ab4stó
ab4stru
abst2r2
ab4st1rú
a3bu2s
abu2t
ab5ut2e
2abú
5a4b5únd2a1t
abú2n1d
5a4b5únde1m
abúnd2e
5a4b5únde1s
5a4b5únd2e1t
abú2t
a3c2a
a1c
a3cá
a3c2æ1
1a2c1c2
2a3ce.
ac2e
2a3c2en
2a3ce1q
2a3ce1u
2a3c2e1v
2ac2i
a3c2l2
2a3c2o
ac2o3ni
acon1
2a3có
a2cu1t
ac2u
a2cú1t
a1d1
a2d2a2d1
ad6am2a2n3s1
ada2ma
ada1man
ad6amanté
adama2n1t
ad6amanti.
adaman3t2i
ad6amanti3b2
ad6amanti1n
ad6amanti3q
ad6amanti2s
ad6amantiu
ad6amantiú
ad6amanti1v
ad6amantí1n
ad6amantí3q
ad6amantí2s
ad6amantí1u2
ad6amantí1v
ad6am2as.
ad6am2a2s1n
ad6am2as3q
ad6am2as1u
ad6am2a2s1v
ad6amá2ns
ada2má
adam2án
ad6amán3t2e
adamá2n1t
ad6amánti.
adamán3t2i
ad6amánti3b2
ad6amánti2s
ad6amántiu
ad6am2á2s1n
ad6am2ás1q
ad6am2ás1u
ad6am2á2s1v
ad2an
a2da2p
ada2q
ad2a1r
ad3á1c
ad2á
adæ2
1a2d1d
a1de4d2
a2d1e2g
ade2q
ade2s
a1dé2d
a2d1é2g
adé2s
1a2d1h
ad3iá1c
ad2iá
adi2g
a2di4mí
adi1m
adi2r
adí2g
adí4mu
adí2r
ad3í2s1s2
ad2ís
ad3ís1t
adí4t2o
adí1t
1a2d1j
1a2d1n2
ado2
a3d4o1c
adó6r2a2ns1
adó1ra
adó6ra2n1t
adó4ras
adó4ra1t
adó4re1m
adó1re
adó6re2n1t
adór2en
adó4rer
adó4res
adó4r2e1t
adó4ri2a
adó1ri
adó4ror
adó1ro1
1a2d1p
1a2d1s2
a2du4l
ad3u4r
a2dú2l
adú4r
ae1
2ae.
aea2b3
a3e2a1mú
a3ea2n1t
ae2an
ae3á1c
ae2á
a3eá2n1t
ae2án
ae3á1p
ae4cu2e
a2e1c
aec2u
1ae3d2
aed4o
2a2e1e
ae2eo
ae2e2ó
ae3e2r
ae3es
ae2e1u
aeé2r
a2eé
ae3és
ae3g2
2a2e1i2
ae3i1c
2a2eí
ae2í1n
a2e1m
2a2en
aení3t
ae1ní
2ae2o
2ae2ó
aepo6tes
ae1p
aep2o
aepo1t
aepot2e
aepo6tés
aepó6tes
aepó1t
aepót2e
ae3q
4aeque.
a4e3qu2e
aeq2u2
ae3r2
ae1r4a
ae1r4i
a2e4r1n2
aer4o1
a2e4r1q
a2e4r1v
aes2c
ae5sc2i
ae4s3c2u
ae4s3cú
ae4sp2o
ae1s2p2
a2e2s1q
aes4t2e
aes1t
aes2ti5t4
aest2i
aes1tí5t4
aete6re6ri
a2e1t
ae3t2e
aete1re
aete6r2e6rí
aete6res
aete6rés
aet2e1ré
aet2e6ri.
aete1ri
aete6r5ii
aete6r5ií
aete6ri6m
aet2e6ri6n
aet2e6ri6q
ae1te6ri6t
aete6rí6m
aet2e1rí
aeter5ímu
aete6rí6n
aete6rí6q
ae1te6rí6t
aeter5ít2i
aete6rí6u2
aete6rí6v
aeté6r5es
aeté1r
aet2é1re
aeté6ri.
aeté6r5ii
aeté6rit2e
ae1téri1t
aeté6ri6t2i
a1e2un
ae1u
2ae2ú
ae1x2
ae2x1u2
1a1f
afe4r
ag2a
a1g
a3g1ae1
a3g2æ3
a2ge1b2
ag2e
a2ger
a2g2e1t
a2g2é1b2
a2g2é1t
a2gi1m2
ag2i
agi6s5t2e
agis3
agis1t
agi6st2r2
a2gí1m
a2gí1t
a2g1n2
ag3ne
ag3ni.
ag1ni
ag3ni1n
ag3ni1q
ag3nis
ag3niu
ag3ni1v
ag3ní1n
ag1ní
ag3ní1q
